Utah statutes.
39-1-56.   Execution of a judgment imposing a fine -- Disposition of fines.

(1) (a)  When the sentence of a military court includes a fine and the sentence has been approved by the officer ordering the court, the adjutant general shall issue a warrant for the collection of the fine, directed to the sheriff or any constable of the county where the person against whom the fine is imposed resides.

(b)  The officer executing the warrant shall collect the fine in the same manner as he is authorized to collect debts in civil suits.  He shall make returns to the adjutant general within 20 days after receiving the warrant.

(c)  Warrants for the collection of fines imposed by military courts shall be issued by the officer appointing the military court.

(2)  All fines collected under this chapter and the regulations governing the National Guard of the United States shall be paid to the state treasurer for the credit of the state General Fund, unless otherwise provided by law.

